California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) In order to maximize federal financial participation for the federal Promoting Safe and Stable Families grant, funds expended from this program are in compliance with data reporting requirements in order to meet federal nonsupplantation requirements in accordance with Section 1357.32(f) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and the 25 percent state match requirement in accordance with Section 1357.32(d) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be made with moneys allocated pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 976, Sec. 2.   (AB 3145)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.51.

(a) In addition to participation in the program provided for under Section 16500.5, Solano and Alameda Counties may, on a two-year project basis, and subject to the election of the board of supervisors of each county to participate, expand the program provided for in Section 16500.5 to also provide those family preservation services to:

(1) Children who have been adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Sections 601 and 602.

(2) Families of children subject to Section 726 and 727.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expanded programs authorized under this section shall be subject to all of the provisions of Section 16500.5 and shall be administered in accordance with Section 16500.5.

(c) The county probation department, through an interagency agreement with the county welfare department, may refer cases to the county welfare department for the provision of services under this subdivision.

(d) The county shall ensure that the proportion of funds used for family preservation services for families and children needing these services pursuant to Sections 300,
 330, 361, and 364 shall be no less than the proportion of those children in the county’s foster care population.

(e) A dependent minor or ward of the court removed from the home pursuant to Section 726 may also be returned to his or her home with appropriate interagency family preservation services as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 16500.5.

(f) This participation is subject to the provisions of Section 16500.5.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1120, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 121.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.55.

Any county that participates in the program pursuant to this section on or after the effective date of the act which amends this section in the 1991 calendar year shall provide services to children who have been adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Sections 601 and 602 only to the extent approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 123.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.65.

(a) In addition to the three programs authorized under Section 16500.5, Contra Costa County may implement a family preservation and reunification program. The program shall be administered in accordance with Section 16500.5, and shall be subject to all of the provisions of that section.

(b) The family preservation program authorized by
 this section may serve all of the following:

(1) Families receiving those services pursuant to Sections 300, 330, 361, and 364.

(2) Children who have been adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Sections 601 and 602.

(3) Families of children subject to Sections 726 and 727.

(c) The county probation department may, through an interagency agreement with the county welfare department, refer cases to the county welfare department for the direct provision of services under this subdivision.

(d) The county shall ensure that the proportion of funds used for family preservation services for families and children needing those services pursuant to Sections 300, 330, 361, and 364 shall be no less
 than the proportion of those children in the county’s foster care program.

(e) The project authorized by this subdivision shall be deemed successful if the following criteria have been met:

(1) At least 75 percent of the children who are not placed in out-of-home care and who receive project services remain in their home for at least six months after the termination of family preservation services.

(2) Two years after the termination of family preservation services, the average length of out-of-home stay of children selected to receive services under this section who, at the time of selection, are in out-of-home care, is 50 percent less than the average length of stay in out-of-home care for children in out-of-home care who do not receive demonstration project services pursuant to this section.

(3) Two years after project services are terminated, at least 60 percent of the children who were returned home with project services remain at home.

(f) (1) The participating county shall submit, to the department and to the appropriate committees of the Legislature, a preliminary report upon the conclusion of the demonstration project, and a final report six months after the conclusion of the project.

(2) The participating county shall, in the reports required by paragraph (1), demonstrate the extent the project met the criteria for determining the success of the project specified in subdivision (e).

(g) A dependent minor or ward of the court removed from the home pursuant to Section 726 may also be returned to his or her home with
 appropriate interagency family preservation services as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 16500.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 124.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.8.

(a) The department shall, in consultation with counties, seek additional federal revenues to finance the family preservation activities described in Section 16500.7. Those revenue sources shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Part A (commencing with
 Section 601) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act contained in Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) Title IV-B of the federal Social Security Act contained in Part B (commencing with Section 620) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any additional funds received pursuant to this section shall supplement, and not supplant, existing funding for family preservation
 services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 125.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.9.

The department shall establish one full-time position, within the office of the director, to assist counties and the department in complying with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and related state laws, regulations, rules of court, and state guidance. This assistance shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Acting as a clearinghouse for up-to-date information regarding tribes within and outside of the state.

(b) Providing information, technical assistance, and support regarding laws, regulations, rules of court, and state guidance applicable to
 Indian child custody proceedings and related matters.

(c) In coordination with other divisions within the department, providing or coordinating training and technical assistance for counties regarding the requirements described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 31.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.

(a) (1) As used in this chapter, “child welfare services” means public social services that are directed toward the accomplishment of any or all of the following purposes:

(A) Protecting and promoting the welfare of all children, including disabled, homeless, dependent, or neglected children.

(B) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems that may result in, the neglect, abuse, exploitation, or delinquency of children.

(C) Preventing the unnecessary separation of children from their families by identifying family problems, assisting families in resolving their problems, and preventing
 breakup of the family where the prevention of child removal is desirable and possible.

(D) Restoring to their families children who have been removed, by the provision of services to the child and the families.

(E) Identifying children to be placed in suitable adoptive homes, in cases where restoration to the biological family is not possible or appropriate.

(F) Ensuring adequate care of children away from their homes, in cases where the child cannot be returned home or cannot be placed for adoption.

(2) “Child welfare services” also means services provided on behalf of children alleged to be the victims of child abuse, neglect, or exploitation. The child welfare services provided on behalf of each child represent a continuum of services, including
 emergency response services, family preservation services, family maintenance services, family reunification services, and permanent placement services, including supportive transition services. The individual child’s case plan is the guiding principle in the provision of these services. The case plan shall be developed within a maximum of 60 days of the initial removal of the child or of the in-person response required under subdivision (f) if the child has not been removed from their home, or by the date of the dispositional hearing pursuant to Section 358, whichever comes first.

(3) “Child welfare services” are best provided in a framework that integrates service planning and delivery among multiple service systems, including the mental health system, using a team-based approach, such as a child and family team. A child and family team brings together individuals that engage with the child or youth and family in assessing, planning, and
 delivering services consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 16501.1. Use of a team approach increases efficiency, and thus reduces cost, by increasing coordination of formal services and integrating the natural and informal supports available to the child or youth and family.

(4) “Child and family team” means a group of individuals who are convened by the placing agency and who are engaged through a variety of team-based processes to identify the strengths and needs of the child or youth and their family, and to help achieve positive outcomes for safety, permanency, and well-being. The child and family team shall have the same meaning as the “family and permanency team,” as described in Section 675a(c)(1)(B)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(A) The activities of the team shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Providing input into the development of a child and family plan that is strengths-based, needs-driven, and culturally relevant.

(ii) Providing input into the placement decision made by the placing agency and the services to be provided in order to support the child or youth.

(iii) On and after October 1, 2021, for a child placed into a short-term residential therapeutic program, providing input into all of the following:

(I) Required determinations by a qualified individual pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096.

(II) Required components of the case plan, including those specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16501.1.

(III) Development of the plan for family-based aftercare services described in Section 4096.6.

(iv) Providing input to the placing agency in developing the Immediate Needs Plan for using the Immediate Needs Funding for each child in the Immediate Needs Program established by Section 16562.

(v) Supporting the child and family, as desired by the child and family, by discussing options for goods, services, activities, and supports for the Strengths Building Spending Plan consistent with the Strengths Building Program as described in Section 16565.

(vi) Supporting the child and family with resolving disputes that may arise regarding the selection of goods, services, activities and supports for the Strengths Building Spending Plan under the Strengths Building
 Program established in Section 16565, as needed.

(B) (i) The child and family team process shall engage the child or youth, the child’s family, and other people important to the family or to the child or youth in meeting the objectives set forth in subparagraph (A). The child and family team shall also include representatives who provide formal supports to the child or youth and family when appropriate, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) The caregiver.

(II) The placing agency caseworker.

(III) A representative from a foster family agency or short-term residential therapeutic program with which a child or youth is placed.

(IV) A county mental
 health representative.

(V) A representative from the regional center if the child is eligible for regional center services.

(VI) The child or youth’s Court-Appointed Special Advocate, if one has been appointed, unless the child or youth objects.

(VII) A representative of the child or youth’s tribe or Indian custodian, as applicable.

(ii) As appropriate, the child and family team also may include other formal supports, such as substance use disorder treatment professionals and educational professionals, providing services to the child or youth and family. For purposes of this definition, the child and family team also may include extended family and informal support persons, such as friends, coaches, faith-based connections, and tribes as identified by
 the child or youth and family. If placement into a short-term residential therapeutic program or a foster family agency that provides treatment services has occurred or is being considered, the mental health representative is required to be a licensed mental health professional. Any party to the child’s case who is represented by an attorney may consult with their attorney regarding this process. The child or youth and their family may request specific persons to be included on the child and family team. Nothing shall preclude another agency serving the child or youth from convening a team in collaboration with the placing agency.

(5) “Child and family team meeting” means a convening of all or some members of the child and family team. A child and family team meeting may be requested by any member of the child and family team.

(A) Upon the scheduling of a child and family team
 meeting, a notification shall be provided to the child or youth, their parent or guardian, and the caregiver.

(B) The placing agency shall document the occurrence and summary of the child and family team meeting on the child and family team action plan form developed by the department with any necessary redactions, a copy of which shall be attached to the court report that is prepared pursuant to Section 358.1, 366.1, or 706.5. The department shall issue written guidance identifying the necessary
 redactions.

(C) (i) The child’s court-appointed educational rights holder, if someone other than the parent, guardian, or caregiver, shall be invited to the child and family team meeting if either of the following applies:

(I) The child and family team will develop and implement a placement preservation strategy pursuant to Section 16010.7.

(II) The child and family team will discuss a placement change.

(ii) The child and family team shall discuss if remaining in the school of origin is in the child’s best interest.

(iii) Pursuant to, and in accordance with, Section 48853.5 of the Education Code, if the child’s educational rights holder
 determines that remaining in, or returning to, the child’s school of origin is in the child’s best interest, the child and family team, in consultation with the foster care educational liaison, shall determine an appropriate transportation plan for the child to attend their school of origin and any available extracurricular activities.

(6) Child welfare services may include, but are not limited to, a range of service-funded activities, including case management, counseling, emergency shelter care, emergency in-home caretakers, temporary in-home caretakers, respite care, therapeutic day services, teaching and demonstrating homemakers, parenting training, substance abuse testing, transportation, and specialized permanency services. These service-funded activities shall be available to children and their families in all phases of the child welfare program in accordance with the child’s case plan and departmental regulations. Funding for services
 is limited to the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act and other available county funds.

(7) Service-funded activities to be provided may be determined by each county, based upon individual child and family needs as reflected in the service plan.

(8) As used in this chapter, “emergency shelter care” means emergency shelter provided to children who have been removed pursuant to Section 300 from their parent or parents or their guardian or guardians. The department may establish, by regulation, the time periods for which emergency shelter care shall be funded. For the purposes of this paragraph, “emergency shelter care” may include “transitional shelter care facilities” as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) As used in this chapter, “specialized
 permanency services” means services to assist a child or nonminor dependent whose case plan is for permanent placement or supportive transition to adulthood in achieving a permanent family through reunification, adoption, legal guardianship, or other lifelong connection to caring adults, including at least one adult who will provide a permanent, parent-like relationship for the child or nonminor dependent. Specialized permanency services are designed for and with the child to address the child’s history of trauma, separation, and loss. “Specialized permanency services” may include all of the following:

(A) Medically necessary mental health services, if the medical necessity criteria for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, as described in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, is met, as needed to ameliorate impairments in significant areas of life functioning that may reduce the likelihood of the
 child or nonminor dependent achieving a permanent family, and may include other services designed to address the child’s or nonminor dependent’s history of trauma, grief, loss, stigma, and rejection that reduce the likelihood of the child or nonminor dependent achieving a permanent family.

(B) Permanency support core services, as appropriate to achieve, stabilize, and sustain the child or nonminor dependent in a permanent family.

(C) Services designed to prepare the identified permanent family to meet the child’s or nonminor dependent’s needs, set appropriate expectations before and after permanency is achieved, and stabilize the placement.

(b) As used in this chapter, “respite care” means temporary care for periods not to exceed 72 hours, and, in order to preserve the placement, may be extended up to 14 days in any
 one month pending the development of policies and regulations in consultation with county placing agencies and stakeholders. This care may be provided to the child’s parents or guardians. This care shall not be limited by regulation to care over 24 hours. These services shall not be provided for the purpose of routine, ongoing childcare.

(c) The county shall provide child welfare services as needed pursuant to an approved service plan and in accordance with regulations promulgated, in consultation with the counties, by the department. Counties may contract for service-funded activities, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). Counties shall not contract for needs assessment, client eligibility determination, or any other activity as specified by regulations of the State Department of Social Services, except as specifically authorized in Section 16100.

(d) This chapter
 shall not be construed to affect duties that are delegated to probation officers pursuant to Sections 601 and 654.

(e) A county may utilize volunteer individuals to supplement professional child welfare services by providing ancillary support services in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Department of Social Services.

(f) As used in this chapter, emergency response services consist of a response system providing in-person response, 24 hours a day, seven days a week, to reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, as required by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code for the purpose of investigation pursuant to Section 11166 of the Penal Code and to determine the necessity for providing initial intake services and crisis intervention to maintain the child safely in their own home or to protect the safety of the
 child. County welfare departments shall respond to any report of imminent danger to a child immediately and all other reports within 10 calendar days. An in-person response is not required when the county welfare department, based upon an evaluation of risk, determines that an in-person response is not appropriate. This evaluation includes collateral contacts, a review of previous referrals, and other relevant information, as indicated.

(g) As used in this chapter, family maintenance services are activities designed to provide in-home protective services to prevent or remedy neglect, abuse, or exploitation, for the purposes of preventing separation of children from their families.

(h) As used in this chapter, family reunification services are activities designed to provide time-limited foster care services to prevent or remedy neglect, abuse, or exploitation, when the child cannot
 safely remain at home, and needs temporary foster care, while services are provided to reunite the family.

(i) (1) As used in this chapter, permanent placement services are activities designed to provide an alternate permanent family structure for children who, because of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, cannot safely remain at home and who are unlikely to ever return home. These services shall be provided on behalf of children for whom there has been a judicial determination of a permanent plan for adoption, legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or continued foster care placement, and, as needed, shall include supportive transition services to nonminor dependents, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(2) For purposes of this section, “another planned permanent living arrangement” means a permanent plan ordered by the
 court for a child 16 years of age or older or a nonminor dependent, when there is a compelling reason or reasons to determine that it is not in the best interest of the child or nonminor dependent to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed for tribal customary adoption in the case of an Indian child, or be placed with a fit and willing relative. Placement in a group home, or, on and after January 1, 2017, a short-term residential therapeutic program, shall not be the identified permanent plan for any child or nonminor dependent.

(j) As used in this chapter, family preservation services include those services specified in Section 16500.5 to avoid or limit out-of-home placement of children, and may include those services specified in that section to place children in the least restrictive environment possible.

(k) (1) (A) In any
 county electing to implement this subdivision, all county welfare department employees who have frequent and routine contact with children shall, by February 1, 1997, and all welfare department employees who are expected to have frequent and routine contact with children and who are hired on or after January 1, 1996, and all such employees whose duties change after January 1, 1996, to include frequent and routine contact with children, shall, if the employees provide services to children who are alleged victims of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, sign a declaration under penalty of perjury regarding any prior criminal conviction, and shall provide a set of fingerprints to the county welfare director.

(B) The county welfare director shall secure from the Department of Justice a criminal record to determine whether the employee has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation. The Department of Justice shall deliver the
 criminal record to the county welfare director.

(C) If it is found that the employee has been convicted of a crime, other than a minor traffic violation, the county welfare director shall determine whether there is substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the employee is of good character so as to justify frequent and routine contact with children.

(D) An exemption shall not be granted pursuant to subparagraph (C) if the person has been convicted of a sex offense against a minor, or has been convicted of an offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, 264.1, 273d, 288, or 289 of the Penal Code, or in paragraph (1) of Section 273a of, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 368 of, the Penal Code, or has been convicted of an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code. The county welfare director shall suspend such a person from
 any duties involving frequent and routine contact with children.

(E) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), the county welfare director may grant an exemption if the employee or prospective employee, who was convicted of a crime against an individual specified in paragraph (1) or (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, has been rehabilitated as provided in Section 4852.03 of the Penal Code and has maintained the conduct required in Section 4852.05 of the Penal Code for at least 10 years and has the recommendation of the district attorney representing the employee’s or prospective employee’s county of residence, or if the employee or prospective employee has received a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code. In that case, the county welfare director may give the employee or prospective employee an opportunity to explain the conviction and shall
 consider that explanation in the evaluation of the criminal conviction record.

(F) If criminal record information has not been recorded, the county welfare director shall cause a statement of that fact to be included in that person’s personnel file.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. An action that the county welfare director is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the
 verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this subdivision, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(l) (1) Consistent with Section 675a(c)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code, “qualified individual” means a trained professional or licensed clinician responsible for conducting the determination described in subdivision (g) of Section 4096 and determining the most effective and appropriate placement for a child. In the case of an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1, a person may be designated by the child’s tribe as the qualified individual pursuant to this subdivision and as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.6. In the absence of that designation, the qualified individual shall have specialized
 knowledge of, training about, or experience with, tribes and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the qualified individual shall not be an employee of the IV-E agency and shall not be connected to, or affiliated with, any placement setting in which the IV-E agency places children.

(3) (A) The department shall seek approval from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for authorization to permit employees of the IV-E agency or an individual connected to, or affiliated with, a placement setting to serve as the qualified individual who conducts the assessment described in subdivision (g) of Section 4096. A request for approval shall describe the process through which the department may certify that an employee of a Title IV-E agency, or individual
 connected to or affiliated with a placement setting, and designated as a qualified individual will maintain objectivity in conducting the assessment and determination of the most effective and appropriate placement for a child or nonminor dependent.

(B) Any process developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be developed jointly with the State Department of Health Care Services and in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Education, county child welfare, probation, and behavioral health agencies, and other interested stakeholders.

(C) If approval is granted, the department and the State Department of Health Care services shall issue joint instructions to counties regarding the process for the department to approve a joint request and plan submitted to the department by a county placing agency and behavioral health plan to permit
 an individual who is an employee of a Title IV-E agency or connected to, or affiliated with, a IV-E placement setting to serve as a qualified individual.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 26.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.01.

(a) A county may arrange for respite care for a child or nonminor dependent supervised by the county, which may be provided by any of the following:

(1) Prior to January 1, 2021, a licensed foster family home or certified family home.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2021, the approved home of a relative, as defined in Section 319, or nonrelative extended family member, as described in Section 362.7.

(3) An approved resource family, as defined in Section 16519.5 of this code and Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) At the option of a county, a respite care provider
 certified by the county pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) A county electing to certify respite care providers shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure an inspection of the home and grounds of the prospective respite care provider, consistent with standards developed under the resource family approval program, to determine that the home and grounds are free of conditions that may pose an undue risk to the health and safety of a child or nonminor dependent.

(2) Secure and evaluate the criminal record of the prospective respite care provider and all adults residing in the home pursuant to Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. The prospective respite care provider and all adults residing in the home shall obtain a criminal record clearance or exemption prior to certification. A nonminor dependent shall not be
 subject to criminal background clearances pursuant to Sections 1522 and 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code for the purpose of certifying a prospective respite care provider.

(3) Check if the prospective respite care provider is listed in the Child Abuse Central Index and investigate any substantiated reports pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Determine whether the prospective respite care provider is willing and able to provide respite care to a child or nonminor dependent, taking into consideration the age, maturity, behavioral tendencies, mental and physical health, medications, abilities and limitations, and developmental level of, and court orders for, a child or nonminor dependent.

(5) Require the prospective respite care provider to complete the training specified in paragraph (13)
 of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5.

(c) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (b), when the need for respite care is unanticipated and the proposed respite care provider is a relative of the child, as defined in Section 319, or nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7, and the proposed respite care provider has an established relationship with the child, nonminor dependent, or caregiver and it is in the best interest of the child or nonminor dependent, the county electing to certify respite care providers shall do all of the following:

(1) Cause a state-level criminal records check to be conducted by an appropriate government agency through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System pursuant to Section 16504.5 and assess the results consistent with Section 361.4.

(2) Check if the relative or nonrelative extended family member is listed in the Child Abuse Central Index and investigate any substantiated reports pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Determine whether the proposed respite care provider is willing and able to provide respite care to a child or nonminor dependent, taking into consideration the age, maturity, behavioral tendencies, mental and physical health, medications, abilities and limitations, and developmental level of, and court orders for, a child or nonminor dependent.

(4) Permit a proposed respite care provider who has not completed the required training to provide respite care to a child or nonminor dependent.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county from requiring that a respite care provider meet
 additional standards in order to be certified as a respite care provider by the county.

(e) Unless otherwise prohibited by the child’s social worker, probation officer, or court order, nothing in this section shall prohibit a resource family from arranging for a babysitter or alternative caregiver to provide, on an occasional basis, care and supervision to a child placed in the home.

(f) (1) A home certified as a respite care provider shall not be an eligible placement for a child who is the subject of a voluntary placement agreement, has been adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or as to whom a petition has been filed under Section 325.

(2) A home certified as a respite care provider shall not be eligible to receive AFDC-FC or Approved Relative Caregiver
 funding. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent a county from using other available funds to support respite care services.

(g) Until regulations are adopted, the department may implement this section through the issuance of written directives that shall have the same force and effect as regulations. Any directive affecting Article 1 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations shall be approved by the Department of Justice. The directives shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 935, Sec. 5.   (SB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.02.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Alternative care” means care and supervision of more than 24 consecutive hours, but no more than 72 consecutive hours unless the foster child’s social worker or probation officer provides prior approval.

(2) “Alternative caregiver” means a person who is at least 18 years of age and provides alternative care for a foster child in either his or her home or the home of the caregiver.

(3) “Caregiver” means any licensed or certified foster parent, approved relative
 caregiver, or approved nonrelative extended family member, or approved resource family.

(4) “Reasonable and prudent parent” or “reasonable and prudent parent standard” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 362.05.

(b) A caregiver may arrange for occasional alternative care of his or her foster child and allow an alternative caregiver to provide care and supervision to the foster child, unless prohibited by the foster child’s social worker or probation officer or court order.

(c) A caregiver shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard in determining and selecting an appropriate alternative caregiver.

(d) A caregiver shall
 endeavor to provide an alternative caregiver with all of the following information before leaving the foster child for purposes of alternative care:

(1) Information about the foster child’s emotional, behavioral, medical, or physical conditions, if any, necessary to provide care for the foster child during the time the foster child is being supervised by the alternative caregiver.

(2) Any medication that should be administered to the foster child during the time the foster child is being supervised by the alternative caregiver.

(3) Emergency contact information that is valid during the time the foster child is being supervised by the alternative caregiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 43.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.1.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the foundation and central unifying tool in child welfare services is the case plan.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that a case plan ensures that the child receives protection and safe and proper care and case management, and that services are provided to the child and parents or other caretakers, as appropriate, in order to improve conditions in the parent’s home, to facilitate the safe return of the child to a safe home or the permanent placement of the child, and to address the needs of the child while in foster care.

(3) The agency shall consider and document the recommendations of the child and family team,
 as defined in Section 16501, if any are available. The agency shall document the rationale for any inconsistencies between the case plan and the child and family team recommendations.
